Utah statutes.
26-19-7.    Notice of claim by recipient -- Department response --
Conditions for proceeding -- Collection agreements -- Department's right to
intervene -- Department's interests protected -- Remitting funds --
Disbursements -- Liability and penalty for noncompliance.
(1) (a)  A recipient may not file a claim, commence an action, or settle,
compromise, release, or waive a claim against a third party for recovery of
medical costs for an injury, disease, or disability for which the department
has provided or has become obligated to provide medical assistance, without
the department's written consent as provided in Subsection (2)(b) or (4).
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(a), consent may be obtained if:
(i)  a recipient who files a claim, or commences an action against a third
party notifies the department in accordance with Subsection (1)(d) within ten
days of making his claim or commencing an action; or
(ii)  an attorney, who has been retained by the recipient to file a claim, or
commence an action against a third party, notifies the department in
accordance with Subsection (1)(d) of the recipient's claim:
(A)  within 30 days after being retained by the recipient for that purpose; or
(B)  within 30 days from the date the attorney either knew or should have
known that the recipient received medical assistance from the department.
(c)  Service of the notice of claim to the department shall be made by
certified mail, personal service, or by e-mail in accordance with Rule 5 of
the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, to the director of the Office of Recovery
Services.
(d)  The notice of claim shall include the following information:
(i)  the name of the recipient;
(ii)  the recipient's Social Security number;
(iii)  the recipient's date of birth;
(iv)  the name of the recipient's attorney if applicable;
(v)  the name or names of individuals or entities against whom the recipient
is making the claim, if known;
(vi)  the name of the third party's insurance carrier, if known;
(vii)  the date of the incident giving rise to the claim; and
(viii)  a short statement identifying the nature of the recipient's claim.
(2) (a)  Within 30 days of receipt of the notice of the claim required in
Subsection (1), the department shall acknowledge receipt of the notice of the
claim to the recipient or the recipient's attorney and shall notify the
recipient or the recipient's attorney in writing of the following:
(i)  if the department has a claim or lien pursuant to Section 26-19-5 or has
become obligated to provide medical assistance; and
(ii)  whether the department is denying or granting written consent in
accordance with Subsection (1)(a).
(b)  The department shall provide the recipient's attorney the opportunity to
enter into a collection agreement with the department, with the recipient's
consent, unless:
(i)  the department, prior to the receipt of the notice of the recipient's
claim pursuant to Subsection (1), filed a written claim with the third party,
the third party agreed to make payment to the department before the date the
department received notice of the recipient's claim, and the agreement is
documented in the department's record; or
(ii)  there has been a failure by the recipient's attorney to comply with any
provision of this section by:
(A)  failing to comply with the notice provisions of this section;
(B)  failing or refusing to enter into a collection agreement;
(C)  failing to comply with the terms of a collection agreement with the
department; or
(D)  failing to disburse funds owed to the state in accordance with this
section.
(c) (i)  The collection agreement shall be:
(A)  consistent with this section and the attorney's obligation to represent
the recipient and represent the state's claim; and
(B)  state the terms under which the interests of the department may be
represented in an action commenced by the recipient.
(ii)  If the recipient's attorney enters into a written collection agreement
with the department, or includes the department's claim in the recipient's
claim or action pursuant to Subsection (4), the department shall pay
attorney's fees at the rate of 33.3% of the department's total recovery and
shall pay a proportionate share of the litigation expenses directly related to
the action.
(d)  The department is not required to enter into a collection agreement with
the recipient's attorney for collection of personal injury protection under
Subsection 31A-22-302(2).
(3) (a)  If the department receives notice pursuant to Subsection (1), and
notifies the recipient and the recipient's attorney that the department will
not enter into a collection agreement with the recipient's attorney, the
recipient may proceed with the recipient's claim or action against the third
party if the recipient excludes from the claim:
(i)  any medical expenses paid by the department; or
(ii)  any medical costs for which the department is obligated to provide
medical assistance.
(b)  When a recipient proceeds with a claim under Subsection (3)(a), the
recipient shall provide written notice to the third party of the exclusion of
the department's claim for expenses under Subsection (3)(a)(i) or (ii).
(4)  If the department receives notice pursuant to Subsection (1), and does
not respond within 30 days to the recipient or the recipient's attorney, the
recipient or the recipient's attorney:
(a)  may proceed with the recipient's claim or action against the third party;
(b)  may include the state's claim in the recipient's claim or action; and
(c)  may not negotiate, compromise, settle, or waive the department's claim
without the department's consent.
(5)  The department has an unconditional right to intervene in an action
commenced by a recipient against a third party for the purpose of recovering
medical costs for which the department has provided or has become obligated to
provide medical assistance.
(6) (a)  If the recipient proceeds without complying with the provisions of
this section, the department is not bound by any decision, judgment,
agreement, settlement, or compromise rendered or made on the claim or in the
action.
(b)  The department may recover in full from the recipient or any party to
which the proceeds were made payable all medical assistance which it has
provided and retains its right to commence an independent action against the
third party, subject to Subsection 26-19-5(3).
(7)  Any amounts assigned to and recoverable by the department pursuant to
Sections 26-19-4.5 and 26-19-5 collected directly by the recipient shall be
remitted to the Bureau of Medical Collections within the Office of Recovery
Services no later than five business days after receipt.
(8) (a)  Any amounts assigned to and recoverable by the department pursuant to
Sections 26-19-4.5 and 26-19-5 collected directly by the recipient's attorney
must be remitted to the Bureau of Medical Collections within the Office of
Recovery Services no later than 30 days after the funds are placed in the
attorney's trust account.
(b)  The date by which the funds must be remitted to the department may be
modified based on agreement between the department and the recipient's
attorney.
(c)  The department's consent to another date for remittance may not be
unreasonably withheld.
(d)  If the funds are received by the recipient's attorney, no disbursements
shall be made to the recipient or the recipient's attorney until the
department's claim has been paid.
(9)  A recipient or recipient's attorney who knowingly and intentionally fails
to comply with this section is liable to the department for:
(a)  the amount of the department's claim or lien pursuant to Subsection (5);
(b)  a penalty equal to 10% of the amount of the department's claim; and
(c)  attorney's fees and litigation expenses related to recovering the
department's claim.
